Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 2. Custody and Visitation
§ 20-2-204.
Enforcement and modification.

Either parent may petition to enforce or modify any court order regarding custody and visitation.

A court having jurisdiction under W.S.

20-2-203

may, upon appropriate motion of a party, require a parent to appear before the court and show just cause why the parent should not be held in contempt, upon a showing that the parent has willfully violated an order concerning the care, custody and visitation of the children. In order to enforce and require future compliance with an order the court may find that the parent is in contempt of court, award attorney’s fees, costs and any other relief as the court may deem necessary under the circumstances to the party aggrieved by the violation of an order.

A court having jurisdiction may modify an order concerning the care, custody and visitation of the children if there is a showing by either parent of a material change in circumstances since the entry of the order in question and that the modification would be in the best interests of the children pursuant to W.S. 20-2-201(a). In any proceeding in which a parent seeks to modify an order concerning child custody or visitation, proof of repeated, unreasonable failure by the custodial parent to allow visitation to the other parent in violation of an order may be considered as evidence of a material change of circumstances. Any modification under this subsection shall be subject to the limitations and requirements of W.S.

20-2-205

.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 34, § 1; 2011, ch. 36, § 2.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added the last sentence in (c).

Editor's notes. —

Many of the following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Procedural requirements. —

While the general rule is that a court has continuing jurisdiction to modify the custody and support aspects of its own decree, such jurisdiction is bestowed upon the court only through proper petition by one of the parents in the underlying action pursuant to former Wyo. Stat. Ann. 20-2-113(a). Erhart v. Evans, 2001 WY 79, 30 P.3d 542,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2001).

Supreme Court of Wyoming's precedent clearly answers that Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-204(c) (2015) limits the modification of a final order, not the modification of a temporary order. Demers v. Nicks, 2016 WY 13, 366 P.3d 977,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2016).

Whether or not to modify a decree is in the sound discretion of the court. —

Beard v. Beard, 368 P.2d 953,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1962).

The district court exercises broad discretion in making decisions that pertain to child custody. Wilcox-Elliott v. Wilcox, 924 P.2d 419,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Court had jurisdiction. —

District court plainly had jurisdiction over a father’s petition to modify custody, and it had authority to use a guardian ad litem (GAL) to assist in deciding the petition, because when the father invoked the district court’s jurisdiction by filing a petition to modify custody and alleging a material change in circumstances the district court had before it a child custody matter and authority to appoint a GAL. Van Fleet v. Guyette, 2020 WY 78, 466 P.3d 812,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2020).

Two step analysis. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-201(a) sets forth factors to be considered in determining the best interests of a child in an initial custody proceeding, however, it is only during the second step of a modification inquiry that Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-204(c) requires consideration of the best interests of the child pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-201(a). A best interest analysis is not required, nor even necessarily appropriate, to the threshold determination as to whether a material change in circumstances has occurred. CLH v. MMJ (In re TLJ), 2006 WY 28, 129 P.3d 874,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2006).

Due process.—

District court did not abuse its discretion by holding an hour and a half telephonic hearing on the father's modification motions; the manner in which the district conducted the hearing was not unreasonable under the circumstances, and it did not deny the father his right to due process. ELA v. AAB, 2016 WY 98, 382 P.3d 45,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2016).

Mother was not denied due process when the district court refused to consider the email attachments to the mother’s reply brief at the hearing on the mother’s motion for order to show cause why the father was not to be held in contempt because the attachments were not evidence as a motion for order to show cause was not a pleading to which written instruments could have been attached and the emails were not written legal documents. The mother also made no attempt at the hearing to establish foundation for the proper admission of the emails. Heimer v. Heimer, 2021 WY 97, 494 P.3d 472,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2021).

Parental stipulation. —

Under former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-113(a), the legal prerequisite on a party filing a petition for modification of a child support provision in a divorce decree cannot be extinguished by parental stipulation to reduced payments. The law precludes parties from bargaining away the funds intended for the exclusive benefit of their children. Erhart v. Evans, 2001 WY 79, 30 P.3d 542,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2001).

Contempt orders cannot be converted. —

Under former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-113(a), neither a contempt order or stipulation temporarily modifying a party's child support obligation reflected a petition to modify a divorce decree respecting child support where the contempt orders made no findings as to a change in circumstances warranting modification and where the parties did not expressly or impliedly consent to consideration of modification by the court. Erhart v. Evans, 2001 WY 79, 30 P.3d 542,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2001).

Under former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-113(a), without a petition for modification of child support, evidence of consent to modification, and appropriate findings of changed circumstances, contempt orders cannot be converted by application of W.R.C.P. 15(b) to orders modifying the original support order. Erhart v. Evans, 2001 WY 79, 30 P.3d 542,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2001).

No jurisdiction to modify child custody. —

In post-divorce proceedings, the district court erred by modifying child custody the absence of a petition from either party/parent seeking such modification. It was without jurisdiction to do so under this section.
Weiss v. Weiss, 2009 WY 124, 217 P.3d 408,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2009), reh'g denied,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. Nov. 10, 2009).

Court had jurisdiction. —

Full evidentiary hearing was not required before the trial court temporary changed custody, as the temporary order was only to last until the parties could conduct some discovery and engage in enough preparation for a custody trial that was set. Tracy v. Tracy, 2017 WY 17, 388 P.3d 1257,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2017).

Burden of proof for modification of custody. —

There is a serious danger that courts will be so ready to modify custody orders that the child will be disturbed and upset by repeated changes — the only cure being continued careful scrutiny of each case at the trial court level, coupled with the imposition of a heavy burden of persuasion upon the party asking for modification. Tanner v. Tanner, 482 P.2d 443,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1971).

Where parties to divorce suit made written agreement as to custody of children, burden is on applicant to show cause for its modification. Stirrett v. Stirrett, 35 Wyo. 206, 248 P. 1,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1926).

Where it is contended that due to changed conditions a previous decree providing for custody of a child should be modified in the interest of the child so as to better provide for its welfare, the burden is upon the party alleging it, to prove that such change has in fact occurred, and that it warrants a modification. Laughton v. Laughton, 71 Wyo. 506, 259 P.2d 1093,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1953).

In determining whether or not there should be a modification of a divorce decree as to custody, it is the movant's burden to show there has been a change of circumstance and that, the welfare of the child being of first import, the change warrants a modification. Tanner v. Tanner, 482 P.2d 443,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1971).

The party moving to modify the child custody provisions of a divorce decree has the burden of showing that the modification will be in the best interests of the children. Ayling v. Ayling, 661 P.2d 1054,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1983).

The party seeking a modification of the custody provisions of a divorce decree bears the burden of showing that: (1) a substantial or material change in circumstances affecting the child's welfare has occurred subsequent to the entry of the initial decree; and (2) a modification of the decree will be in the child's best interests. Wilcox-Elliott v. Wilcox, 924 P.2d 419,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Custody decree will not be modified unless there is a substantial change of circumstances

occurring subsequent to the decree. It is not to be done except for the most cogent reasons. Leitner v. Lonabaugh, 402 P.2d 713,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1965).

In order to justify a substantial modification of decree awarding custody of a child, there must be a change of circumstances or the discovery of material facts unknown to the court at the time of the original decree. The paramount consideration is the welfare of the child. Laughton v. Laughton, 71 Wyo. 506, 259 P.2d 1093,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1953).

While modification of a decree as concerns child custody rests in the sound judicial discretion of the trial court, a change will be made only for the most cogent reasons. Tanner v. Tanner, 482 P.2d 443,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1971).

In order for a modification of a decree to be warranted, it must be established that there has been a material or substantial change in circumstances which outweighs society's interest in applying the doctrine of res judicata. Mentock v. Mentock, 638 P.2d 156,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 408

(Wyo. 1981).

Because of the res judicata effect generally afforded divorce decrees, the party seeking to modify the child custody provisions of a divorce decree must show that there has been a substantial change in circumstances since the entry of the original decree warranting a modification of the child custody provisions. Ayling v. Ayling, 661 P.2d 1054,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1983).

The district court's determination that a child's desire to live with her mother did not constitute a material change in circumstances justifying modification of custody did not amount to an abuse of discretion or disclose any procedural error. Mulkey-Yelverton v. Blevins, 884 P.2d 41,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1994).

Where parties' 2002 stipulation altered only visitation, not custody, the initial custody order, entered in 1998, was still in effect; therefore, the 1998 order was ‘the order in question’ under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-204(c), for purposes of a later petition to modify custody. TW v. BM, 2006 WY 68, 134 P.3d 1262,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2006).

It was error
to make a mother show a material change in circumstances to modify
a visitation order because (1) the original, California, order allowed
modification in the child's best interests without showing a change,
(2) that order preempted Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-204(c), under U.S. Const. art. VI, cl. 2, given the full faith and credit clause, U.S. Const. art. IV, § 1, and (3) 28 U.S.C.S. § 1738A required enforcing the California order according to
the order's terms. Gjertsen v. Haar, 2015 WY 56, 347 P.3d 1117,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2015).

Evidence warranted modification of divorce decree provisions

relating to the father's visitation with his minor daughter and the mother's medical insurance coverage for herself and the child, where the parties willingly presented and tried the modification issues, and the court reasonably concluded from the evidence that the parties wanted it to exercise its revisory powers. Gaines v. Doby, 794 P.2d 566,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. Aug. 14, 1990).

Contempt order improper.—

District court abused its discretion in holding the mother in contempt for violations related to the children’s brokerage accounts that had been remedied before the case was filed. Breen v. Black, 2020 WY 94, 467 P.3d 1023,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2020).

When the district court found the mother in civil contempt for failure to pay her share of the children’s medical bills, the district court improperly transferred the father’s burden to prove nonpayment to the mother to prove payment; if the father had established by clear evidence that the mother owed an amount certain on the medical bills, the burden would have shifted, but until he did so, the burden rested squarely on the father. As there was no clear violation of the order, the contempt finding was reversed. Breen v. Black, 2020 WY 94, 467 P.3d 1023,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2020).

Improper contempt order made attorney fee award also improper.—

Because the district court erred in holding the mother in contempt, the award of attorney’s fees to the father was also reversed. Breen v. Black, 2020 WY 94, 467 P.3d 1023,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2020).

Change of circumstances not found.—

District court did not abuse its discretion when it found no material change of circumstances in a child custody matter because the evidence supported the decision as the child was doing well; the mother had a full-time job with benefits; there was no evidence of any disruption to the child’s schooling, medical care, or family relationships; the mother and father regularly communicated and cooperated about all aspects of the child’s life; the mother’s emotional condition was stable; and the mother had no issues with alcohol or drugs. Smith v. Kelly, 2019 WY 60, 442 P.3d 297,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2019).

District court did not err in finding no substantial change of circumstances had occurred when children did not spend one-half of each year with their mother as provided in custody decree where it found parties had foreseen that provision in the decree would not be strictly adhered to because children would have to commute to school. Sorensen v. May, 944 P.2d 429,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1997).

District court did not abuse its discretion by ruling that the changes of circumstances that occurred after the parties'
divorce were not material and did not justify a change of custody because: (1) while the mother did, at times, fail to communicate with the father as required by the decree, significant evidence showed that she informed of many events affecting their sons, including illnesses and injuries, and discussed issues with the father, such as the older son's need for counseling and the younger son's behavioral problems; (2) the record did not establish that the mother repeatedly violated the visitation provisions of the decree, as the father testified that she had only interfered with his visitation rights one time in 2004; (3) at the time of trial, the younger son's behavioral problems had resolved and the older son's anxiety problems had also improved; (4) even though the mother moved frequently after the divorce, there was no evidence that she moved in order to undermine the relationship between the father and the children; and (5) the evidence established that, despite having experienced a great deal of instability in their lives since the divorce, at the time of trial the sons were healthy, well-behaved children who were generally doing well in school and living in a stable home with their mother, her fiance, and their new baby.
Morris v. Morris, 2007 WY 174, 170 P.3d 86,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 2007).

District court did not abuse its discretion in denying the father's motion to modify the mother's visitation; the district court found that the mother's practice of dressing her son as a girl was being addressed in counseling, and implicitly the district court found that the child's welfare was being preserved, and while other judges might have found a material change of circumstances, the court could not retry the case on appeal, and no abuse of discretion was found. ELA v. AAB, 2016 WY 98, 382 P.3d 45,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2016).

In a child
custody dispute, there was no material change in circumstances to
warrant a change in custody because a detective who investigated a
report of abuse by a step-brother found that there was no evidence
to support the allegation, and the step-brother no longer had any
physical contact with the children. Thus, the evidence demonstrated
that it was unlikely that the children were being abused by the step-brother
and those allegations did not constitute a material change in circumstances.
Willis v. Davis, 2013 WY 44, 299 P.3d 88,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2013).

District court
abused its discretion by determining that the changes in the mother's life created a material change in circumstances warranting the reopening
of the existing custody order because the relatives abilities of
the parties to parent their daughter had not materially changed. The
evidence
showed that the mother's move to Denver did not change the
existing
parenting agreement, the father presented no evidence that
the mother
was unable to provide for her daughter after she lost
her job, he
presented no evidence that the mother's theft conviction
affected
their daughter, the mother's dating following the divorce
and her
remarriage did not result in a material change in circumstances. Kappen v. Kappen, 2015 WY 3, 341 P.3d 377,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2015), reh'g denied,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. Feb. 3, 2015).

Mother did
not show a material change of circumstances justifying a change in
custody because (1) the evidence did not show a father caused parental
alienation to the point of a material change, (2) the parties' improper
behavior toward one another was not new, (3) the mother was still
a flight risk, and (4) incidents of violence and improper discipline
in the father's home, while wrong, were isolated. Gjertsen v. Haar, 2015 WY 56, 347 P.3d 1117,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2015).

Reversal not warranted. —

The error in admitting the testimony of the attorney/guardian ad litem did not result in manifest injustice, and did not warrant reversal of the district court's determination that Mother failed to show a change in circumstances to justify modification of custody. Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Inappropriate behavior was warning sign of substantial change in circumstances,

sufficient to invoke the authority of the court to modify custody and visitation provisions. Hertzler v. Hertzler, 908 P.2d 946,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1995).

Remarriage alone insufficient grounds for modification. —

A divorce decree in favor of husband awarding major custody of child to the husband cannot be modified by wife on a petition filed six months after date of decree on the ground that the wife has remarried and is able now to provide a home for the child, since remarriage in and of itself is not sufficient ground for modification of custody. Laughton v. Laughton, 71 Wyo. 506, 259 P.2d 1093,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1953).

Remarriage by one of the divorced parents, standing alone, does not constitute a material change in circumstances sufficient to justify a change of custody. Kreuter v. Kreuter, 728 P.2d 1129,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 644

(Wyo. 1986).

Relocation by custodial parent. —

An intrastate relocation by a custodial parent, taking children along, cannot by itself be considered a change in circumstances sufficiently substantial and material to justify reopening the question of custody. Watt v. Watt, 971 P.2d 608,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1999), overruled in part, Arnott v. Arnott, 2012 WY 167, 293 P.3d 440,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2012).

District court did not err by determining that a mother's relocation, nearly 1,400 miles from a father, created a material change in circumstances warranting the reopening of the original custody order; the considerable increase in the geographical distance created a material change in circumstances affecting the welfare of the child. Cook v. Moore, 2015 WY 125, 357 P.3d 749,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2015).

It was not an abuse of discretion to modify a child's custody from the child's relocating mother to the child's father because (1) the move was a material change of circumstance, (2) the court thoroughly reviewed relevant factors, so the court's decision was deferred to, and (3) a sibling separation was adequately explained. Paden v. Paden, 2017 WY 118, 403 P.3d 135,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2017).

Relocation warranted modification of visitation. —

Modification of a father's visitation schedule was warranted when
the father moved 40 miles because, when the father moved, the daily
life the parties contemplated for the parties' child ceased to exist,
requiring an inquiry into whether modification of visitation was in
the best interest of the child.
Jensen v. Milatzo-Jensen, 2013 WY 27, 297 P.3d 768,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2013).

Reopening joint custody order. —

When the reopening of a joint custody order is before the court, the stability-of-placement consideration that is central to the strict reopening standards in the primary custodial context appears to be of minimal importance because the joint custody order has not fixed one parent as the primary nurturer. Gurney v. Gurney, 899 P.2d 52,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1995).

A second distinctive feature suggests a joint custody order should be more readily opened. The premise of the joint custody order is the parents' ability to resolve between themselves the custodial details; when the parents are unable to make this cooperative arrangement work, a change of circumstances justifying judicial reexamination of the original joint custody order is demonstrated. Gurney v. Gurney, 899 P.2d 52,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1995).

When joint custodians inform the district court the joint custody ordered by that court has failed, they present a sufficient change in circumstances justifying the reopening of the custody order and awarding of primary custody to one parent. Gurney v. Gurney, 899 P.2d 52,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1995).

Res judicata and collateral estoppel not a bar to relitigation of custody issues. —

Res judicata and collateral estoppel did not bar the modification of a child custody decree where the matters decided in the prior adjudications did not expressly address custody of the children as presented by the father in the last proceeding. Moreover, while the doctrines of res judicata and collateral estoppel can bar reopening a divorce decree, a district court retains jurisdiction to modify a decree of divorce under certain circumstances, most especially where a party is able to show a material change in circumstances surrounding the care, custody, and visitation of a child. Aragon v. Aragon, 2005 WY 5, 104 P.3d 756,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2005).

Res judicata barred second motion to modify custody. —

When the district court denied the mother's motion to modify child custody because the facts before it did not support a material change of circumstances warranting a change in custody under this section, the district court denied her second motion to modify filed nine days later based on the doctrine of res judicata. Because the record on appeal did not include a transcript or statement of the evidence presented at the hearing, the Supreme Court of Wyoming accepted the district court's finding that the issues the mother presented in her second motion were identical to those decided by the first order.
Willis v. Davis, 2010 WY 149, 243 P.3d 568,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2010).

Material change in circumstances. —

In a child custody modification case where there was a split custody arrangement, the trial court erred in not finding that a material change in circumstances had occurred. The mother's relocation to another state could be viewed as such, so too that the mother's fiance and her brother were accused of sexually assaulting the parties' youngest daughter, and also the father's wife's abusive acts against her step-children could warrant a change. Thus the case was remanded for further proceedings. JRS v. GMS, 2004 WY 60, 90 P.3d 718,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2004).

Court did not err in modifying child custody where in addition to considering the mother's multiple relocations, it found that the mother had not maintained stable employment and had not provided adequate supervision of the children, she repeatedly interfered with the father's parental and visitation rights and failed to provide adequate treatment to the youngest daughter for her emotional problems until compelled to provide therapy by court order, and there was evidence that the mother had attempted to emotionally manipulate the children against their father. Harshberger v. Harshberger, 2005 WY 99, 117 P.3d 1244,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2005).

When a mother and father presented a material change in circumstances by their agreement that shared physical custody was not working, the trial court was required under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-204(c) to determine what arrangement was in the child's best interest; the trial court was not limited to maintaining the status quo or in awarding primary custody to the mother on her petition.
Roemmich v. Roemmich, 2010 WY 115, 238 P.3d 89,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2010).

There was material change in circumstances warranting the court's reopening of the existing custody order because both parties invited the district court to revise the joint custody arrangement. Dahlke v. Dahlke, 2015 WY 76, 351 P.3d 937,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2015).

District court correctly concluded that the father established a material change in circumstances to reopen the visitation and that he was entitled to extended summer visitation and specific holiday visitation, but it abused its discretion by granting the father visitation for nearly the entire summer rather than the six weeks requested, as his proposed visitation schedule addressed problems that had arisen by requiring fewer exchanges and providing him with extended periods with the children. Meehan-Greer v. Greer, 2018 WY 39, 415 P.3d 274,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2018).

Modification of custody and award of custody of the parents'
minor child to the father under this section was affirmed because the father's ability to act as responsible parent had surged ahead of that of the mother. He had secured stable employment, continued to advance in his career, and had become financially responsible for himself and his family for a number of years.
BB v. RSR, 2007 WY 4, 149 P.3d 727,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2007).

Since Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-204(c) required a 2 step approach to a child custody modification: (1) a material change in circumstances; and then (2) a best interest of the child analysis, district court properly denied a father's motion for modification without further consideration once it had found there had been no material change in circumstances. CLH v. MMJ (In re TLJ), 2006 WY 28, 129 P.3d 874,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2006).

Change from father to mother urgent as daughter became a teenager. —

Trial court did not err in changing child custody from the father to the mother when the daughter's preference to live with the mother had become more urgent as the daughter became a teenager, and the mother had changed her lifestyle. Basden v. Cole, 2005 WY 151, 123 P.3d 566,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. Dec. 20, 2005).

Sufficient evidence for change of custody. —

Sufficient evidence supported the court's change of custody in favor of the father even though there was favorable testimony in favor of the mother, where the father was better able to provide an environment which could meet the child's emotional, developmental, and educational needs and the father and his wife could provide the child with a more stable home.
Gray v. Pavey, 2007 WY 84, 158 P.3d 667,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2007).

Court properly modified Texas custody order.

The court issued a decision letter containing specific findings of fact that a substantial change of circumstances had taken place based on assaults by the husband, who had custody under the Texas order, on the wife and the children. Rosics v. Heath, 746 P.2d 1284,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 561

(Wyo. 1987), overruled, Marquiss v. Marquiss, 837 P.2d 25,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1992).

Contempt judgment proper. —

Trial court properly entered a judgment for amounts it found were owed to a mother based on a father's contempt under this section as trial courts had inherent and statutory authority to enforce their orders in domestic cases through contempt sanctions; there was no record to support the father's claim that payments he had made against the amounts he owed were not credited. Walker v. Walker, 2013 WY 132, 311 P.3d 170,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2013).

Court did not abuse its discretion in modifying custody award. —

Court did not abuse its discretion in modifying custody award to place the children with the mother, where the court found that the mother had surged far ahead in her personal development and ability to serve as a parent and that neither the mother nor the father was especially fit to be a parent at the time the initial custody determination was made. Thompson v. Thompson, 824 P.2d 557,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1992).

The district court did not abuse its discretion when it awarded custody to the father after the mother was repeatedly found in contempt of the court's orders and the district court found that a change in custody was in the best interests of the children. Ready v. Ready, 906 P.2d 382,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1995).

It was reasonable for the court to conclude that limiting the mother's visitation with the children would limit the damage done by mutual parental insistence upon use of the children as weapons in an acrimonious contest between lifestyles. Hertzler v. Hertzler, 908 P.2d 946,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 1995).

A court did not abuse its discretion by modifying the child custody provisions of a divorce decree where there had been an extreme decrease of stability in the mother's life compared to a significant increase of stability in the father's life. Wilcox-Elliott v. Wilcox, 924 P.2d 419,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1996), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

The district court did not abuse its discretion in transferring custody to the mother where the children ran away from home to be with their mother, indicated a strong preference for living with her, and were involved in the juvenile justice system and ultimately placed in the mother's home by the juvenile court. Rocha v. Rocha, 925 P.2d 231,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1996).

Court properly granted custody of children to their father where the mother failed to respect the father's rights and responsibilities, the father could provide a more stable environment for the children, and he had demonstrated a willingness to create and foster a relationship between the children and the mother. Aragon v. Aragon, 2005 WY 5, 104 P.3d 756,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2005).

Court did not abuse its discretion in finding that it was in the best interests of the children for the mother to have primary custody because the court clearly considered the effect that the mother's arrest, which resulted in a deferral, had on the children, and the 16-year-old son's testimony clearly demonstrated that he preferred the living arrangement he had with mother. Dahlke v. Dahlke, 2015 WY 76, 351 P.3d 937,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2015).

Mother's contention that the district court erred in permitting pre-order evidence as a benchmark to determine whether there had been a material change in circumstances was not considered where she failed to identify any specific evidence that she considered improper; even if the claim was considered, there was no indication that the district court improperly relied on pre-order evidence as it had appropriately based its decision on the change in circumstances occurring after the entry of the original custody order.
BB v. RSR, 2007 WY 4, 149 P.3d 727,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2007).

Order modifying child custody, pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-204(c), was affirmed where the evidence supported findings of a change in circumstances and that it was in the best interests of the children to live with their father, especially given the preference toward preservation of sibling relationships where the two older children were already living with the father which caused the younger two children to be separated from the older two.
Hayzlett v. Hayzlett, 2007 WY 147, 167 P.3d 639,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2007).

No conflict between statutory law and procedural rules as to issue of modification. —

Rule 15(b), W.R.C.P., merely augments and supplements statutory law by stating that certain issues shall be treated “in all respects” as if they had been raised in the pleadings. In other words, the issue of modification may, under certain circumstances, be treated as if it had been requested or petitioned for by a parent. Strahan v. Strahan, 400 P.2d 542,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1965).

Contempt proceedings permissible. —

Contempt proceedings to enforce provisions of decree are part of court's continuing jurisdiction to modify or enforce provisions of a divorce decree regarding support, custody and visitation. Gaines v. Doby, 773 P.2d 442,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1989).

Custody decree will not be modified unless there is a substantial change of circumstances. —

Father's unchanged circumstances, including having substandard housing and a probationary driver's license which limited his ability to pick up the children for visitation, outweighed the mother's relocation, which improved her employment prospects and increased stability for the children around her family, and supported the denial of the father's motion to modify custody. Olsen v. Olsen, 2013 WY 115, 310 P.3d 888,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2013).

Mother properly found in contempt for visitation violations. —

Mother was properly held in civil contempt for violating a father's visitation rights because (1) court orders required certain conduct of the mother regarding that visitation, (2) the mother was aware of the orders, and (3) the mother disobeyed the orders without seeking modification.
Shindell v. Shindell, 2014 WY 51, 322 P.3d 1270,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2014).

Mother was properly found in contempt of the divorce decree's provisions as the visitation and cooperation provisions were sufficiently clear and specific because, before the mother unilaterally discontinued the father's visits, she had allowed visitation supervised by parties other than the one listed in the decree, which was evidence that she understood the visitation terms; the mother was not allowed to unilaterally discontinue the father's visitation; and, although the decree did not specifically require telephone access, when the mother refused to allow the father telephonic or in-person visitation, she willfully interfered with the children's access to their father. Kleinpeter v. Kleinpeter, 2017 WY 76, 397 P.3d 189,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2017).

Motion not made pursuant to statute and appellate court's jurisdiction.—

Motion from which the mother appealed could be interpreted only as seeking temporary custody modification, given that it was not made pursuant to the statute, but plainly requested only an ex parte order granting emergency relief, and she did not serve the motion on the father or his counsel; because the order resolved only the issue of temporary custody, it was not appealable, and because the court lacked jurisdiction, the mother’s appeal was dismissed. Wood v. Wood, 2018 WY 93, 424 P.3d 247,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2018).

Due process rights violated. —

In a custody case, because the district court found the mother to be in indirect contempt of court, without issuing a show cause order on the father’s motion, and that transgression of this statute was a serious procedural error that denied the mother her right to due process, the district court abused its discretion and its contempt holding against the mother was reversed. Womack v. Swan, 2018 WY 27, 413 P.3d 127,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2018).

Due process rights not violated. —

District court did not deny the mother due process by forcing her into a second trial on the merits, without providing her notice that custody of the children was subject to modification, because the mother did not assert that the temporary order should have had conclusive effect under the principles of res judicata and she could not rely on the assertion now to impose retroactively the requirement that the father show a material change of circumstances to modify custody; although the request for setting failed to state with particularity the grounds for the motion, the mother had approximately eight months to file a motion for clarification; and the mother had a meaningful opportunity to prepare and to be heard. Womack v. Swan, 2018 WY 27, 413 P.3d 127,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2018).

Material change in circumstances.—

District court did not abuse its discretion in determining that there had been a material change in circumstances supporting the change of custody from the father to the mother; the father withheld visitation for seven months based upon his own determination that the mother’s boyfriend posed a threat to the child, despite the fact that the district court had found otherwise, and the father did not show that the district court erred in considering the child’s emotional state and/or need for counseling. Bishop v. Bishop, 2017 WY 130, 404 P.3d 1170,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2017).

It was an abuse of discretion to decline to reopen a custody and visitation order on a father’s motion because (1) the court’s apparent belief that the subject children had to show objective evidence of harm before the order could be reopened was error, and (2) the mother’s continued instability, poor decision-making regarding partners and the children’s care, and unwillingness to address issues affecting the children through counseling, which had been ordered, and the parties’ inability to make current custody and visitation arrangements work, demonstrated a material change in circumstances. Jacobson v. Kidd, 2018 WY 108, 426 P.3d 813,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2018).

Wyoming Supreme Court has never said a district court must wait until children exhibit negative consequences before reconsidering custody and/or visitation, but the Court has said that, in order to be considered material, a change in circumstances must affect the children’s welfare, which means that the change holds some relevance in the children’s life, and a circumstance may have relevance in a child’s life before there are outward signs of harm, and a district court may take into account the obvious or natural effects of a situation in finding a material change in circumstance. Jacobson v. Kidd, 2018 WY 108, 426 P.3d 813,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2018).

Proper way to enforce decree but judgment for non-parties improper.—

Wife filed
a motion in the divorce case to hold the husband in contempt of court